Louisiana, session 2026, HB174.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:861(E)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§861. Security required
E.
* * *
(2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this Subsection shall subject
the owner and the operator to the impounding of the vehicle, as provided in R.S.
32:863.1(C), the sanctions which are provided in R.S. 32:57, and limitations on
recovery of damages provided for in this Part. Owners and operators of any motor
vehicle in violation of this Subsection shall be are subject to limitation of recovery
as provided for in R.S. 32:866.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-158 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 174